Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,122
Violations of Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974.

The director or Attorney General may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin violations of the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974, 12 U.S.C. 2601.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 45.